Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2926
Poultry, defined.

Poultry means domesticated birds that serve as a source of eggs or meat and includes, but is not limited to, chickens, turkeys, ducks, and geese.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 26.